North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 19. Agriculture and Forestry Awareness Study Commission.

§ 120-150.
Creation; appointment of members.

There is created an Agriculture and Forestry Awareness Study Commission. Members of the Commission shall be citizens of North Carolina who are interested in the vitality of the agriculture and forestry sectors of the State’s economy. Members shall be as follows:

Three appointed by the Governor.

Three appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

Three appointed by the Speaker of the House.

The chairs of the House Agriculture Committee.

The chairs of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Environment, and Natural Resources.

The Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s designee.

A member of the Board of Agriculture designated by the chair of the Board of Agriculture.

The President of the North Carolina Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., or the President’s designee.

The President of the North Carolina State Grange or the President’s designee.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality or the Secretary’s designee.

The President of the North Carolina Forestry Association, Inc., or the President’s designee.

Members shall be appointed for two-year terms beginning October 1 of each odd-numbered year. The Chairs of the House Agriculture Committee and the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Environment, and Natural Resources shall serve as cochairs. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may each appoint an additional member of the Senate and House, respectively, to serve as cochair. If appointed, these cochairs shall be voting members of the Commission. A quorum of the Commission is nine members.

Cochairs’ terms on the Commission are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a cochair of the Commission shall continue to serve for so long as the cochair remains a member of the General Assembly and no successor has been appointed. A cochair of the Commission who does not seek reelection or is not reelected to the General Assembly may complete a term of service on the Commission until the day on which a new General Assembly convenes. A member of the Commission who resigns or is removed from service in the General Assembly shall be deemed to have resigned or been removed from service on the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 792, s. 20.1; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(81); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 19(b); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 785, s. 1; 1993, c. 23, s. 1; 1995, c. 490, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2001-474, s. 14; 2010-142, s. 9; 2014-103, s. 6; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2018-113, s. 7; 2020-18, s. 4.

§ 120-151.
Advisory Committee.

Upon proper motion and by a vote of a majority of the members present, the Commission may appoint an Advisory Committee. Members of the Advisory Committee should be from the various organizations, commodity groups, associations, and councils representing agriculture and forestry. The purpose of the Advisory Committee shall be to render technical advice and assistance to the Commission. The Advisory Committee shall consist of no more than 20 members plus a chairman who shall be appointed by the cochairmen of the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 792, s. 20.1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 785, s. 2.

§ 120-152.
Subsistence and travel expenses.

The members of the Commission who are members of the General Assembly shall receive subsistence and travel allowances at the rate set forth in

G.S. 120-3.1

. Members who are officials or employees of the State of North Carolina shall receive subsistence and travel allowances at the rate set forth in

G.S. 138-6

. All other members plus the Chairman of the Advisory Committee shall be paid the per diem allowances at the rates set forth in

G.S. 138-5

. Other members of the Advisory Committee shall serve on a voluntary basis and not receive subsistence and travel expenses.

History.

1985, c. 792, s. 20.1.

§ 120-153.
Facilities and staff.

The Commission may hold its meetings in the State Legislative Building with the approval of the Legislative Services Commission. The Legislative Services Commission shall provide necessary professional and clerical assistance to the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 792, s. 20.1.

§ 120-154.
Duties.

The Commission shall bring to the attention of the General Assembly the influence of agriculture and forestry on the economy of the State, develop alternatives for increasing the public awareness of agriculture and forestry, study the present status of agriculture and forestry, identify problems limiting future growth and development of the industry, develop an awareness of the importance of science and technological development to the future of agriculture and forestry industries, and formulate plans for new State initiatives and support for agriculture and forestry and for the expansion of opportunities in these sectors.

In conducting its study the Commission may hold public hearings and meetings across the State.

The Commission shall report to the General Assembly at least one month prior to the first regular session of each General Assembly.

History.

1985, c. 792, s. 20.1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 785, s. 3.

§§ 120-155 through 120-157.

Reserved for future codification purposes.